lexiconNZ.lexd
sab(t)seb(p)pip(p)gib(t)ser(f) lop(p):narcissist
lev(b)*ev(t)bib(b)sor(t) lil(b):narcissus
zhef(t)bu(b)!av(t)tam(p)sul(t) gin(p):narcolepsy
fel(f)fap(f)*of(p) laf(p):narcoleptic
bar(p)bu!(p)veb(b)bal(t)liv(f) tiv(p):narcosis
big(p)deb(p)pas(t)shiv(t) sif(b):narcotic
cub(t)les(f)pab(f)ful(p)gi!(p) !ozh(t):nard
zhuc(b)fo(b)mov(b) zhib(b):nardoo
lew(f)fab(f)fiv(p)ku!(t)gesh(b) shus(p):narial
rof(b)fel(f)bub(p)sag(p)vef(b) bes(b):naris
fos(t)deg(t)log(p)uw(b)pof(p) fu(t):nark
piv(t)bab(b)shat(f)vuv(b)sos(p) gob(f):narraganset
pup(b)pus(t)fuv(b)mel(f)lap(f) lip(b):narrate
bip(p)fob(b)vam(p)sil(b) pib(t):narration
fap(t)!iv(b)ab(t)muk(t) les(b):narrative
log(b)nos(f)sef(p)lug(p) cuv(f):narrator
guf(t)lis(b)fep(f) tuf(p):narratur
fos(p)mif(b)tof(f) faf(b):narrow
bef(t)pab(t)fap(t) fub(b):narrow-minded
bof(f)vif(b)fo(f) fezh(f):narrow-mindedly
cuv(f)vap(p)pal(t)baf(t)us(f) dis(f):narrow-mindedness
fub(t)sul(t)sof(b) !eb(b):narrowed
led(b)*ip(f)leg(b)fil(p)pud(t) liv(t):narrowing
fol(p)geg(f)faf(b) bus(p):narrowly
paf(b)fed(b)shiv(b)pi*(f) lib(f):narrowminded
gif(t)bag(f)dif(t) sib(b):narrowness
pim(f)fog(b)fo*(b)lop(p)fe!(t) !es(f):narrows
les(p)ged(p)lof(t)bag(t) sir(f):narrowsouled
lal(t)pig(f)lol(f)tup(f) tuw(p):narthecium
nis(b)gol(p)suv(t) gap(b):narthex
ap(p)pus(t)gem(f) gab(p):narwhal
sug(t)bup(p)puf(f) zhuf(f):nary
pef(b)kos(t)fil(p) sec(b):nary(a)
sesh(b)lag(t)zhin(t) nef(p):nasal
gis(t)lab(t)lab(p)vaw(t) baf(p):nasalis
tul(p)mav(p)las(f)mif(f)puf(b) gef(f):nasality
fil(p)va(f)wu*(b)gil(p) ow(p):nasalization
bos(f)fit(b)luf(t)lab(t) rek(b):nasally
fep(b)pil(t)kub(b) sos(p):nascent
val(f)bob(f)liv(p)kosh(f) lel(b):nasci
lub(f)gol(t)fug(p)lok(t)web(p) vab(t):nascitur
zhiv(t)siw(b)ful(p)gup(t) zhuk(f):nasdaq
lic(f)vul(p)fes(f)sif(b) fus(p):naseby
vus(f)bos(p)pub(p)cot(p) tub(f):nashville
sel(b)bac(b)nus(b) bog(b):naso
fef(t)tis(b)fav(p) fis(f):nasopharynx
zhes(f)laf(f)baf(f) led(p):nassau
gol(t)beb(f)fus(t) bi(p):nasser
bif(b)ses(b)fen(b) lof(b):nast
sesh(f)sar(f)gid(t) fif(f):nastily
vuf(p)pag(f)mef(t)vup(b)vaf(f) buv(t):nastiness
liv(p)guf(t)fub(p) sish(f):nasturtium
sow(f)ros(t)va(t)bef(p) det(f):nasty
puzh(p)bil(t)beg(f) fef(t):nasua
fip(t)pil(f)zhof(t)nif(f)pas(b) tav(p):nata
pos(b)vosh(b)baf(t)fip(f)bab(b) vef(f):natal
!ek(p)sep(p)bef(f)gul(t)kuv(p) fif(f):natantia
rol(t)los(p)fub(t)dis(t)fo(p) fov(f):natare
vob(t)bov(b)fos(t)naf(p) fip(p):natation
se!(t)sab(b)sos(b) bef(b):natch
fev(b)sus(t)fap(p) sop(b):nathless
paf(t)muzh(b)lig(f) bo(b):nati
fob(f)les(b)zhib(b)gev(t) geb(p):naticidae
biv(t)lef(b)tol(t) seb(t):nation
dub(p)*ob(p)fa*(p)gas(p) suzh(t):national
fen(b)zheg(b)bus(f)guk(t)faf(b) sel(p):nationale
lap(b)lol(b)bab(b) pib(f):nationalism
kig(b)sil(b)bif(b) pa!(t):nationalist
sif(p)!of(b)zheg(b)pul(p)*ef(f) wil(f):nationality
keb(t)pos(b)but(p)lif(p) !el(p):nationalization
fid(p)dop(p)vab(t)bep(f)so(b) fiw(p):nationally
vaf(p)pop(f)fus(t) wef(p):nations
zhop(f)suv(t)fis(b)vuf(b) gog(t):native
kesh(b)lu(f)fif(t) gul(b):native-born
vef(b)big(f)ves(f) bav(p):nativeness
bav(f)sif(p)lib(p) vos(b):nativism
so!(b)lif(f)bub(t)fif(t)bus(p) vef(p):nativist
vul(t)sis(b)tel(t)luv(b)pub(b) bac(t):nativity
las(t)fa*(b)bip(b)vaf(p) bof(b):natrix
op(t)fiv(f)le!(b)!of(f)gef(p) *od(b):natterjack
lul(t)sel(p)val(p)saf(t) fuv(t):nattily
*ur(b)gif(f)vac(b)shil(f) vuv(b):natty
cub(f)fub(t)vep(t)fot(p)ras(b) sub(t):natura
*el(b)ship(f)bub(p) fop(b):naturae
gozh(f)*ob(t)bush(f) vul(b):natural
vok(p)geb(t)bos(f) vim(b):naturalibus
vil(b)lap(p)gef(p) vep(p):naturalism
gip(t)daf(b)mov(p) fis(b):naturalist
!eb(b)fel(b)la*(f) guf(t):naturalistic
fal(b)fus(b)fop(t) vof(f):naturalization
bef(p)gad(p)raf(t)fash(b) fuv(f):naturalize
suv(f)waf(b)dil(f)buf(f)pil(f) pap(f):naturalized
som(b)les(b)vol(p)fal(f) vok(t):naturally
gac(t)pib(b)pes(f)dis(p) fal(t):naturalness
sob(t)ris(t)fes(f)bug(f)lep(p) bi(f):nature
fev(f)pov(t)lew(t)wam(f)paf(t) ful(b):natureal
neg(p)po*(b)rav(t)nil(t) rib(f):naturel
duf(p)gof(t)fiw(b)rif(t)zhur(t) zho(b):natures
fas(b)vo!(p)fum(f)ful(b)to!(f) wap(b):naturistic
mug(b)lig(f)vof(b)shud(b) lip(f):naturoe
pel(f)bef(p)buf(f) bon(t):naturopath
guf(p)seg(p)lef(p)bip(f)ma!(b) gob(p):naturopathy
!as(f)gas(b)lug(p)kib(t) *up(t):natus
shil(p)pif(p)!ib(t)*aw(t)vor(b) lel(t):nauclea
vef(t)lol(t)lif(f)fup(t) !as(f):naucrates
gif(p)lec(p)lus(t) pur(b):naught
vil(b)pif(f)vos(b) sap(t):naughtiness
fol(p)*ib(f)zhew(b)piv(t)vos(b) buzh(p):naughty
fis(f)dil(b)fos(b)vesh(t) sof(t):naumachia
saf(t)lob(t)lip(b)sug(p) fof(p):naumachy
puv(b)pek(t)val(t)!ip(t) dob(t):nauran
biv(p)zhoc(p)fe*(t)fus(p)dub(f) sab(b):nauru
bul(f)bob(f)leb(f)zhuzh(f)cuf(f) cas(f):nauruan
fof(p)fiv(f)gif(b) seb(b):nausea
cuf(t)get(b)lop(t) shog(t):nauseam
fif(f)dol(p)tag(t)fil(b) pav(p):nauseate
few(p)fib(p)pu!(t)*uf(p) zhaf(t):nauseated
fuv(p)biv(b)top(p)i!(f)bel(b) gew(b):nauseating
suf(t)gi*(f)doc(t)sug(p) !e*(f):nauseous
bof(f)kek(f)buf(t)fi*(t)bug(p) vim(t):nautch
dol(p)lul(p)*al(p)mil(f) paf(t):nautchgirl
bep(t)cug(p)mif(t)push(t) gal(t):nautical
uv(b)wuf(p)fon(p)geb(b)tib(f) sav(p):nautilidae
pen(t)bel(f)si(f)zhul(f)fel(p) *ib(t):nautilus
bif(b)mev(p)fi(t) av(b):navaho
fub(p)fel(b)bof(b)dosh(f) !ef(t):naval
gep(p)bi(t)seb(f)bul(b) tus(p):navarch
!ab(f)ot(f)fo*(t) fub(b):navarino
sa(b)vad(b)fas(b)bam(t) ruv(f):nave
pib(f)feg(p)so!(t)sib(t)kic(t) besh(p):navel
lil(t)sof(f)!af(b)fis(f) !el(p):navicular
pim(f)fog(b)fo*(b)lop(p)fe!(t) !es(f):navigability
puf(t)zhob(t)wep(f)ge*(b)kel(t) bof(f):navigable
sub(f)seg(f)pim(b)gef(b) cov(t):navigate
lib(t)fof(p)pul(b)luf(b)mul(f) bef(p):navigation
se(p)ig(b)pam(p)lib(f)vash(p) saf(b):navigational
cir(t)lun(p)pul(b) tuf(f):navigator
vob(t)mil(b)fep(b) shik(b):navvy
lok(t)sus(t)bow(b)les(p)fov(p) bon(f):navy
va(b)tep(t)vep(t)zhid(b)bas(p) sup(b):nawab
fib(t)sev(p)lep(f) ship(f):nay
sag(f)gul(b)sul(p)bo!(p) bum(b):naysayer
*a!(b)shef(t)bol(f) lab(p):naysaying
*ip(p)lis(b)sig(f) shat(f):nazarewne
fuv(f)fup(p)*ub(t)bis(f) shuf(b):naze
so(f)gol(b)lel(f)luzh(f) bod(t):nazi
fis(t)pag(f)tif(b)seb(p)fer(f) fof(p):nazism
vil(t)bop(t)dul(p)sab(f) sug(p):nb
lash(p)!op(t)sus(f)los(f)lus(p) buk(t):nc
rab(f)va*(t)shif(t)buf(t)fil(t) shuf(t):nd
gas(p)boc(f)bif(p) dep(b):ndebele
gog(b)sow(f)lek(f)bob(b) so!(f):ndjamena
sos(f)se*(f)feb(p)fif(f) veb(b):ne
vaw(f)gef(t)vus(f) zhar(f):neaf
sev(b)a!(f)bef(t) bap(b):neanderthal
lav(f)fif(t)nes(p) teb(t):neap
cin(p)tus(b)lav(f) bag(t):neapolitan
peb(t)mew(t)ves(p) bot(b):near
!is(b)fof(f)gef(f)pur(b) bal(f):near(a)
puf(f)wesh(f)bul(t)peb(p) vis(b):nearby
paf(t)*i(f)fov(f)lap(t) beb(t):nearer
lob(t)ush(b)pir(b)ug(b)vuf(p) baf(b):nearest
rof(b)fel(f)bub(p)sag(p)vef(b) bes(b):nearly
sel(b)vol(p)fos(t)bep(f)vup(b) le!(p):nearness
!ig(p)ruf(b)dab(t)fa(b) gif(t):nearside
was(t)*ub(t)fuf(b) so!(b):nearsighted
lok(p)!of(t)sul(b)sho!(f) lo*(f):neat
rop(p)bug(p)bep(t) cut(b):neathanded
bob(f)ba(p)bef(b)veg(b)pab(f) tag(t):neatherd
ub(p)fub(b)liv(b) sog(f):neatly
vul(b)baf(b)bof(f)pom(f) siw(f):neatness
*i(t)so!(t)sel(t) sif(t):neats
rib(p)fuf(b)fug(t)so*(p) o(p):neb
lip(t)bac(b)lab(p)shas(p)*id(f) wif(p):nebraska
gev(t)buzh(p)mil(f)les(f)cub(p) zhiv(p):nebraskan
laf(t)fib(b)si!(b)sal(f)gaf(t) fif(f):nebula
fof(p)seb(p)sup(p)pif(p) fis(f):nebulae
fov(p)ban(b)lup(f) fuw(f):nebular
lef(p)pof(t)fed(t)kaf(t)bu*(p) lib(f):nebulosity
vok(t)fad(f)bu*(p) tav(t):nebulous
wo!(b)sib(t)bab(t)fas(b) fog(t):nebulously
wel(t)los(f)bap(f)fol(p)fog(p) sec(f):nec
pul(b)sas(t)fof(p)vov(t)bas(f) baw(f):necessarian
!ib(b)pib(b)vub(f)pal(f) bof(p):necessaries
lup(t)shis(b)fol(b)pig(t) beb(t):necessarily
dut(p)sas(f)fud(b)bif(f)!ob(f) sug(t):necessary
gib(b)fa*(f)suf(f)fel(t) nozh(f):necessita
guv(t)*ol(p)ba*(b)reb(f)nab(t) ov(p):necessitarian
gub(b)fel(b)vaw(f)fob(f)ba(b) lim(f):necessitas
lal(b)lof(b)lag(t)gos(f) lav(p):necessitate
bil(t)ram(f)fish(b) lazh(t):necessitation
faf(f)pab(t)nif(p)pub(b) fav(p):necessities
cog(b)fib(b)fam(t)sug(t) far(f):necessitous
gil(t)luf(t)wazh(t)vazh(p)vaf(f) fif(t):necessity
shap(f)sul(p)puv(b)wum(t)cuf(t) fizh(f):necio
tif(b)vef(b)lol(t)fozh(p)bos(t) suw(b):neck
gap(f)bip(f)bob(t)fab(b)fes(b) nig(t):neckar
pos(p)gim(p)fid(b)tib(t)gel(f) vol(b):neckband
vep(f)peg(b)bes(p)fos(p) po!(p):neckcloth
wep(f)fuv(t)fep(b)beg(t)gib(t) vu*(p):necked
bug(t)rib(p)ves(t)sup(f)suf(b) guf(t):neckerchief
lus(p)lep(f)rof(f)tes(t) ces(t):necklace
la(f)les(f)!el(b) vuv(b):neckless
ses(b)shov(b)shef(p) sap(b):necklet
gap(t)gov(p)kuf(t)fum(p)se!(t) fi!(t):necklike
fuzh(b)!on(f)fef(f)zhiv(f) fik(b):neckline
cir(t)lun(p)pul(b) tuf(f):neckpiece
suk(t)gaf(p)zhib(p)pit(t) fob(p):necks
fes(f)dud(b)rab(f)fas(t) ful(p):necktie
sil(b)fig(p)zhob(b)baf(p)naf(p) sus(b):neckwear
pug(b)be!(b)shel(f)bup(f)lil(f) zhef(t):necrobiosis
bak(p)lol(f)pu(p)let(b)gi!(p) muk(f):necrology
fob(b)!et(p)mov(p) guw(f):necromancer
ler(t)bol(p)bog(f)shim(b)bul(p) bu!(b):necromancy
lef(f)gaf(b)vas(t)sezh(p) fap(b):necromantic
sop(b)wug(b)de(b) ur(p):necrophagia
lob(b)bof(t)fus(f) fim(f):necrophilia
fi!(b)kos(t)vid(b)fop(b)sag(t) ful(p):necropolis
sef(t)!eb(f)zhac(p) tif(b):necropsy
fof(f)bes(t)kev(f)sef(f) gos(b):necroscopic
bab(b)sal(p)sav(p) fush(p):necrosis
fil(f)dob(p)lib(p) !ar(f):necrotic
neb(f)pum(b)sug(f) wuk(b):nectar
buv(f)rup(f)nav(f)bub(b)puf(b) wil(t):nectarine
kal(b)sos(p)caf(t)fip(f)ful(p) peb(b):nectarious
vil(f)fic(f)pef(b) *if(b):nectary
*el(t)lof(t)lol(b)sul(t) bik(t):necturus
vak(f)le*(t)pas(f) lat(f):nee
sim(f)laf(t)zhem(p)fug(b)dav(t) faw(b):need
bis(b)kof(b)zhog(p)pel(t)fov(t) et(b):needed
fol(p)pik(f)bu(t)!iv(b) lezh(b):needful
bi!(p)fog(b)veb(f) *ak(t):needfulness
dus(p)keg(b)*ig(f) lezh(f):neediness
sof(b)*ot(b)gel(b) pas(f):needle
lef(b)far(t)ser(b)fof(p)fo!(b) dam(t):needlebush
bil(b)lef(t)gal(f)fo!(t) sas(b):needlefish
fif(f)sil(f)*of(f) kuf(t):needlepoint
rib(t)sil(t)far(b)lew(f) faf(t):needles
vuf(p)vit(f)tof(p) sef(p):needless
lus(t)fef(t)ko*(f)pag(b) fap(p):needlessly
is(b)fam(b)feg(b)bil(t) *af(f):needlewoman
lub(f)wuf(f)def(p) vas(b):needlewood
lof(t)fef(b)suf(f)led(f) cup(t):needlework
lash(p)lul(f)fof(t)ces(b)vat(t) pag(f):needleworker
kim(t)*a!(t)val(f)ret(b) vac(f):needs
sav(b)pim(f)kob(p) !af(b):needy
piv(t)kaf(t)*ed(f)wob(p) pib(t):neem
luf(p)bol(f)fob(t)sub(b)vol(t) bum(f):neencephalon
lif(t)bot(f)feg(t)lol(t) fuf(b):neer
shis(p)fef(b)gif(t)fub(t) shab(p):neerdowell
sel(t)veg(t)lol(t) buf(f):nefarious
ful(p)si(b)*er(b)loc(b)fib(t) fef(p):nefariously
wev(p)sav(p)cip(p) vos(f):nefariousness
lum(t)fip(t)fen(t) vub(b):nefas
od(f)fob(f)wob(f)buc(f)zhal(t) lup(b):negaprion
vog(b)fup(t)bo(p)fab(t)lul(f) lef(b):negation
fob(b)sag(t)low(b)ul(p)mob(f) sig(t):negative
pazh(p)bob(p)bash(f) kol(b):negatively
fab(b)lip(p)fis(t)piv(t)iv(p) cov(b):negativeness
sha!(t)sev(b)li*(b)fil(b)lip(p) dib(b):negativism
shel(t)fip(f)fi!(p) pal(b):negatory
peg(f)fek(f)pal(f)fib(t) rel(b):negev
fab(b)fuf(t)puf(f) ges(b):neglect
pizh(f)mol(t)vof(p) ow(b):neglected
vob(f)vap(b)suv(p)faf(p) li!(p):neglectful
pow(b)ber(f)up(b) shul(t):neglectfully
fal(f)bal(t)fin(b)buf(t) lop(f):neglecting
pom(p)val(t)bup(b)wok(f) vef(f):negligable
sas(p)fep(f)sul(p)fen(t)sab(f) shif(b):neglige
ful(b)neg(p)pus(f)luf(p) la*(b):negligee
fov(b)eg(p)ku!(t)fos(f)baf(b) po*(b):negligence
duc(p)wag(t)gas(b) bit(t):negligent
pov(t)kaw(t)fol(b) lul(p):negligently
la*(f)fil(b)pib(f)duf(p)nub(t) pam(f):negligible
pup(t)bu*(f)lash(t)lof(t) mul(p):negotiable
lol(f)mav(b)det(p)shil(b) sig(f):negotiate
fosh(t)sol(b)vif(p)reb(t)pos(b) puk(t):negotiation
fel(t)!el(b)sog(t) sus(p):negotiations
*is(t)len(t)von(t)zhos(t)sis(b) giv(t):negotiator
weg(f)gif(f)lum(f)ki!(b)fof(t) *og(f):negotiatress
sul(b)rish(t)la(f)luf(t) ba!(f):negotiis
vel(b)vop(f)fazh(t)dub(f) tes(p):negress
laf(b)po(f)fev(p)!ub(p)sash(t) zhes(t):negritude
gab(p)fof(f)fab(b) peg(b):negro
bil(t)def(b)lun(b)wuv(b)pif(f) lik(f):negroid
mif(p)sas(b)faf(f)sas(f)wis(f) fav(f):negrophobia
luf(p)bud(t)fuf(t)be!(f)nul(b) bag(p):negus
fac(p)god(b)fuv(p)fub(f) vib(t):nehru
vozh(p)sel(p)vof(f)sif(p) cil(b):neif
gush(p)*ev(t)sog(b)seb(t)ber(t) fab(f):neigh
